Massachusetts, session 194th, H1344.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 4G the
following section:-
Section 4H. Upon receipt of notice of non-renewal of a homeowner’s insurance policy,
the named insured shall have 180 days to fulfill the requirements for the continuance of coverage
contained within the said receipt.
of 1